Utah statutes.
23-19-11.   Age restriction -- Proof of hunter education required.

(1) A person born after December 31, 1965, may not purchase a hunting license or permit unless proof is presented to the division or one of its authorized wildlife license agents that the person has passed a division-approved hunter education course offered by a state, province, or country.

(2)  For purposes of this section, "proof" means:

(a)  a certificate of completion of a hunter education course;

(b)  a preceding year's hunting license  or permit issued by a state, province, or country with the applicant's hunter education number noted on the hunting license or permit; or

(c)  verification of completion of a hunter education course pursuant to Subsections (3) and (4).

(3)  If an applicant for a nonresident hunting license or permit is not able to present a hunting license, permit, or a certificate of completion as provided in Subsections (1) and (2), the division may contact another state, province, or country to verify the completion of a hunter education course so that a nonresident hunting license or permit may be issued.

(4)  If an applicant for a resident or nonresident hunting license or permit has completed a hunter education course in Utah but is not able to present a hunting license, permit, or a certificate of completion as provided in Subsections (1) and (2), the division may research the division's hunter education records to verify that the applicant has completed the hunter education course.

(5) (a)  If an applicant for a resident or nonresident hunting license has completed a hunter education course and is applying for a hunting permit or license through the division's drawings, Internet site, or other electronic means authorized by the division, the applicant's hunter education number and the name of the state, province, or country that issued the number may constitute proof of completion of a hunter education course under this section.

(b)  The division may research the hunter education number to verify that the applicant has completed a division-approved hunter education course.

(6)  Upon issuance of the hunting license or permit, the division shall indicate the applicant's hunter education number on the face of the hunting license or permit.

(7)  The division may charge a fee for any service provided in Subsection (3) or (4).



Amended by Chapter 75, 2001 General Session

